Washington statutes.
RCW 41.58.005

Intent—Construction.

(1) It is the intent of the legislature by the adoption of chapter 296, Laws of 1975 1st ex. sess. to provide, in the area of public employment, for the more uniform and impartial (a) adjustment and settlement of complaints, grievances, and disputes arising out of employer-employee relations and, (b) selection and certification of bargaining representatives by transferring jurisdiction of such matters to the public employment relations commission from other boards and commissions. It is further the intent of the legislature, by such transfer, to achieve more efficient and expert administration of public labor relations administration and to thereby ensure the public of quality public services.

(2) Nothing contained in chapter 296, Laws of 1975 1st ex. sess. shall be construed to alter any existing collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing bargaining agreement.

(3) Nothing contained in chapter 296, Laws of 1975 1st ex. sess. shall be construed to alter any power or authority regarding the scope of collective bargaining in the employment areas affected by chapter 296, Laws of 1975 1st ex. sess., but chapter 296, Laws of 1975 1st ex. sess. shall be construed as transferring existing jurisdiction and authority to the public employment relations commission.

(4) Nothing contained in chapter 296, Laws of 1975 1st ex. sess. shall be construed to prohibit the consideration or adjustment of complaints or grievances by the public employer.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 296 s 1.]